Utah statutes.
58-13-5.   Information relating to adequacy and quality of medical care --
Immunity from liability.
(1)  As used in this section, "health care provider" has the same meaning as
defined in Section 78B-3-403.
(2) (a)  The division, and the boards within the division that act regarding
the health care providers defined in this section, shall adopt rules to
establish procedures to obtain information concerning the quality and adequacy
of health care rendered to patients by those health care providers.
(b)  It is the duty of an individual licensed under Title 58, Occupations and
Professions, as a health care provider to furnish information known to him
with respect to health care rendered to patients by any health care provider
licensed under Title 58, Occupations and Professions, as the division or a
board may request during the course of the performance of its duties.
(3)  A health care facility as defined in Section 26-21-2 which employs,
grants privileges to, or otherwise permits a licensed health care provider to
engage in licensed practice within the health care facility, and any
professional society of licensed health care providers, shall report any of
the following events in writing to the division within 60 days after the event
occurs regarding the licensed health care provider:
(a)  terminating employment of an employee for cause related to the employee's
practice as a licensed health care provider;
(b)  terminating or restricting privileges for cause to engage in any act or
practice related to practice as a licensed health care provider;
(c)  terminating, suspending, or restricting membership or privileges
associated with membership in a professional association for acts of
unprofessional, unlawful, incompetent, or negligent conduct related to
practice as a licensed health care provider;
(d)  subjecting a licensed health care provider to disciplinary action for a
period of more than 30 days;
(e)  a finding that a licensed health care provider has violated professional
standards or ethics;
(f)  a finding of incompetence in practice as a licensed health care provider;
(g)  a finding of acts of moral turpitude by a licensed health care provider;
or
(h)  a finding that a licensed health care provider is engaged in abuse of
alcohol or drugs.
(4)  This section does not prohibit any action by a health care facility, or
professional society comprised primarily of licensed health care providers to
suspend, restrict, or revoke the employment, privileges, or membership of a
health care provider.
(5)  The data and information obtained in accordance with this section is
classified as a "protected" record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government
Records Access and Management Act.
(6) (a)  Any person or organization furnishing information in accordance with
this section in response to the request of the division or a board, or
voluntarily, is immune from liability with respect to information provided in
good faith and without malice, which good faith and lack of malice is presumed
to exist absent clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.
(b)  The members of the board are immune from liability for any decisions made
or actions taken in response to information acquired by the board if those
decisions or actions are made in good faith and without malice, which good
faith and lack of malice is presumed to exist absent clear and convincing
evidence to the contrary.
(7)  An individual who is a member of a hospital administration, board,
committee, department, medical staff, or professional organization of health
care providers is, and any hospital, other health care entity, or professional
organization conducting or sponsoring the review, immune from liability
arising from participation in a review of a health care provider's
professional ethics, medical competence, moral turpitude, or substance abuse.
(8)  This section does not exempt a person licensed under Title 58,
Occupations and Professions, from complying with any reporting requirements
established under state or federal law.
